District of Columbia statutes.
11-2501

Admission to bar; regulations; prior admission.

(a)

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall make such rules as it deems proper respecting the examination, qualification, and admission of persons to membership in its bar, and their censure, suspension, and expulsion.

(b)

Members of the bar of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall be eligible to practice in the District of Columbia courts.

(c)

Members of the bar of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia in good standing on April 1, 1972, shall be automatically enrolled as members of the bar of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, and shall be subject to its disciplinary jurisdiction.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Regulated non-health related occupations and professions, general license law, see § 47-2853.04.
This section is referenced in § 47-2805.02 and § 47-2853.04.
1981 Ed., § 11-2501.
1973 Ed., § 11-2501.